Virginia statutes. Title 62.1. Waters of the State, Ports and Harbors.
Chapter 21. Virginia Resources Authority.

§ 62.1-197.
Short title.

This chapter shall be known and may be cited as the Virginia Resources Authority Act.

History.

1984, c. 699; 1985, c. 67.

Cross references.

As to the Virginia Tobacco Region Revolving Fund, see Chapter 31.1 (§ 3.2-3112 et seq.) of Title 3.2.

For the Virginia Broadband Infrastructure Loan Fund, see §

15.2-2419

et seq.

Law Review.

For note discussing the issues of eminent domain and water allocation as related to coal slurry pipelines, see 17 U. Rich. L. Rev. 789 (1983).

OPINIONS OF THE ATTORNEY GENERAL

Authority within Commerce and Trade Secretariat. —

Virginia Resources Authority, as a political subdivision of the Commonwealth, is a state-created governmental entity within the Commerce and Trade Secretariat for state government organizational purposes; however, such inclusion does not alter the independent nature of the Authority to govern its own affairs in accordance with its enabling statutes. See opinion of Attorney General to William G. O’Brien, Chairman, Board of Directors, Virginia Resources Authority, 02-077, 2002 Va. AG LEXIS 155 (9/19/02).

§ 62.1-198.
Legislative findings and purposes.

The General Assembly finds that there exists in the Commonwealth a critical need for additional sources of funding to finance the present and future needs of the Commonwealth for water supply; land conservation or land preservation including land for parks and other recreational purposes; oyster restoration projects, including planting and replanting with seed oysters, oyster shells, or other material that will catch, support, and grow oysters; wastewater treatment facilities; drainage facilities; solid waste treatment, disposal and management facilities; recycling facilities; resource recovery facilities; energy conservation and energy efficiency projects; professional sports facilities; certain heavy rail transportation facilities; public safety facilities; airport facilities; the remediation of brownfields and contaminated properties, including properties contaminated by defective drywall; the design and construction of roads, public parking garages and other public transportation facilities, and facilities for public transportation by commuter rail; construction of local government buildings, including administrative and operations systems and other local government equipment and infrastructure; site acquisition and site development work for economic and community development projects; recovered gas energy facilities; the location or retention of federal facilities in the Commonwealth and the support of the transition of former federal facilities from use by the federal government to other uses; and renewable energy projects, including solar, wind, biomass, waste-to-energy, and geothermal. This need can be alleviated in part through the creation of a resources authority. Its purpose is to encourage the investment of both public and private funds and to make loans, grants, and credit enhancements available to local governments to finance water and sewer projects, land conservation or land preservation programs or projects, oyster restoration projects, drainage projects, solid waste treatment, disposal and management projects, recycling projects, energy conservation and energy efficiency projects, professional sports facilities, resource recovery projects, public safety facilities, airport facilities, the remediation of brownfields and contaminated properties including properties contaminated by defective drywall, the design and construction of roads, public parking garages and other public transportation facilities, and facilities for public transportation by commuter rail, site acquisition and site development work for the benefit of economic development projects, technology, construction of local government buildings, including administrative and operations systems and other local government equipment and infrastructure, infrastructure for broadband services, recovered gas energy facilities, federal facilities or former federal facilities, and renewable energy projects. The General Assembly determines that the creation of an authority for this purpose is in the public interest, serves a public purpose and will promote the health, safety, welfare, convenience or prosperity of the people of the Commonwealth.

History.

1984, c. 699; 1989, cc. 533, 551; 1990, c. 506; 1998, c. 399; 2000, c. 790; 2001, cc. 652, 661; 2003, c. 561; 2005, cc. 727, 769; 2007, cc. 81, 649, 663; 2008, cc. 3, 24, 238, 259, 504, 605, 613; 2009, cc. 14, 246, 311, 543, 632; 2010, cc. 42, 724, 820; 2011, c. 270.

Cross references.

For the Virginia Broadband Infrastructure Loan Fund, see §

15.2-2419

et seq.

The 2000 amendments.

The 2000 amendment by c. 790 inserted “professional sports facilities” in the first and third sentences.

The 2001 amendments.

The 2001 amendments by cc. 652 and 661 are identical, and deleted “and” following “sports facilities” in the first and second sentences, and inserted “public safety facilities, and the remediation of brownfields and contaminated properties” at the end of the first and second sentences.

The 2003 amendments.

The 2003 amendment by c. 561 inserted “airport facilities” in two places.

The 2005 amendments.

The 2005 amendment by c. 727 inserted “the design and construction of roads, public parking garages and other public transportation facilities, and facilities for public transportation by commuter rail” in the first and second sentences; and made related changes.

The 2005 amendment by c. 769 added “and the location or retention of federal facilities in the Commonwealth and the support of the transition of former federal facilities from use by the federal government to other uses” to the end of the first sentence, “and federal facilities or former federal facilities” to the end of the second sentence and made minor stylistic changes.

The 2007 amendments.

The 2007 amendments by cc. 81 and 663 are identical, and inserted “land conservation or land preservation” following “water supply” in the first sentence and inserted “land conservation or land preservation programs or projects” preceding “drainage projects” in the third sentence.

The 2007 amendment by c. 649 inserted “technology and infrastructure for wireless broadband services” in the third sentence.

The 2008 amendments.

The 2008 amendments by cc. 3 and 238 are identical, and inserted “including land for parks and other recreational purposes” near the beginning of the first sentence.

The 2008 amendments by cc. 24 and 613 are nearly identical, and inserted “energy conservation and energy efficiency projects” in the first and third sentences.

The 2008 amendments by cc. 259 and 605 are identical, and inserted “construction of local government buildings” near the end of the first and third sentences.

The 2008 amendment by c. 504 deleted “wireless” preceding “broadband services” near the end of the third sentence.

The 2009 amendments.

The 2009 amendments by cc. 14 and 632 are identical, and inserted “site acquisition and site development work for economic and community development projects” near the end in the first sentence.

The 2009 amendments by cc. 246 and 311 are identical, and inserted “site acquisition and site development work for the benefit of economic development projects” following “commuter rail” in the next-to-last sentence.

The 2009 amendment by c. 543 inserted “including administrative and operations systems and other local government equipment and infrastructure” in the first and next-to-last sentences.

The 2010 amendments.

The 2010 amendment by c. 42 inserted “oyster restoration projects, including planting and replanting with seed oysters, oyster shells, or other material that will catch, support, and grow oysters;” in the first sentence and “oyster restoration projects,” in the third sentence.

The 2010 amendment by c. 724 inserted “recovered gas energy facilities” in the first sentence; and in the third sentence, inserted “recovered gas energy facilities,” and deleted “and” preceding “infrastructure for broadband services.”

The 2010 amendment by c. 820 inserted “including properties contaminated by defective drywall” in the first and third sentences.

The 2011 amendments.

The 2011 amendment by c. 270, in the first sentence, added “and renewable energy projects, including solar, wind, biomass, waste-to-energy, and geothermal” and made a related change, and in the next-to-last sentence, added “and renewable energy projects” and made a related change.

§ 62.1-199.
Definitions.

As used in this chapter, unless a different meaning clearly appears from the context:

“Authority”
means the Virginia Resources Authority created by this chapter.

“Board of Directors”
means the Board of Directors of the Authority.

“Bonds”
means any bonds, notes, debentures, interim certificates, bond, grant or revenue anticipation notes, lease and sale-leaseback transactions or any other obligations of the Authority for the payment of money.

“Capital Reserve Fund”
means the reserve fund created and established by the Authority in accordance with §

62.1-215

.

“Cost,”
as applied to any project financed under the provisions of this chapter, means the total of all costs incurred by the local government as reasonable and necessary for carrying out all works and undertakings necessary or incident to the accomplishment of any project. It includes, without limitation, all necessary developmental, planning and feasibility studies, surveys, plans and specifications, architectural, engineering, financial, legal or other special services, the cost of acquisition of land and any buildings and improvements thereon, including the discharge of any obligations of the sellers of such land, buildings or improvements, real estate appraisals, site preparation and development, including demolition or removal of existing structures, construction and reconstruction, labor, materials, machinery and equipment, the reasonable costs of financing incurred by the local government in the course of the development of the project, including the cost of any credit enhancements, carrying charges incurred before placing the project in service, interest on local obligations issued to finance the project to a date subsequent to the estimated date the project is to be placed in service, necessary expenses incurred in connection with placing the project in service, the funding of accounts and reserves which the Authority may require and the cost of other items which the Authority determines to be reasonable and necessary. It also includes the amount of any contribution, grant or aid which a local government may make or give to any adjoining state, the District of Columbia or any department, agency or instrumentality thereof to pay the costs incident and necessary to the accomplishment of any project, including, without limitation, the items set forth above. The term also includes interest and principal payments pursuant to any installment purchase agreement.

“Credit enhancements”
means surety bonds, insurance policies, letters of credit, guarantees and other forms of collateral or security.

“Defective drywall”
means the same as that term is defined in §

36-156.1

.

“Federal facility”
means any building or infrastructure used or to be used by the federal government, including any building or infrastructure located on lands owned by the federal government.

“Federal government”
means the United States of America, or any department, agency or instrumentality, corporate or otherwise, of the United States of America.

“Former federal facility”
means any federal facility formerly used by the federal government or in transition from use by the federal government to a facility all or part of which is to serve any local government.

“Local government”
means any county, city, town, municipal corporation, authority, district, commission or political subdivision created by the General Assembly or pursuant to the Constitution and laws of the Commonwealth or any combination of any two or more of the foregoing.

“Local obligations”
means any bonds, notes, debentures, interim certificates, bond, grant or revenue anticipation notes, leases, credit enhancements, or any other obligations of a local government for the payment of money.

“Minimum capital reserve fund requirement”
means, as of any particular date of computation, the amount of money designated as the minimum capital reserve fund requirement which may be established in the resolution of the Authority authorizing the issuance of, or the trust indenture securing, any outstanding issue of bonds or credit enhancement.

“Project”
means (i) any water supply or wastewater treatment facility, including a facility for receiving and stabilizing septage or a soil drainage management facility, and any solid waste treatment, disposal, or management facility, recycling facility, federal facility or former federal facility, or resource recovery facility located or to be located in the Commonwealth, the District of Columbia, or any adjoining state, all or part of which facility serves or is to serve any local government, and (ii) any federal facility located or to be located in the Commonwealth, provided that both the Board of Directors of the Authority and the governing body of the local government receiving the benefit of the loan, grant, or credit enhancement from the Authority make a determination or finding to be embodied in a resolution or ordinance that the undertaking and financing of such facility is necessary for the location or retention of such facility and the related use by the federal government in the Commonwealth. The term includes, without limitation, water supply and intake facilities; water treatment and filtration facilities; water storage facilities; water distribution facilities; sewage and wastewater (including surface and ground water) collection, treatment, and disposal facilities; drainage facilities and projects; solid waste treatment, disposal, or management facilities; recycling facilities; resource recovery facilities; related office, administrative, storage, maintenance, and laboratory facilities; and interests in land related thereto. The term also includes energy conservation measures and facility technology infrastructure as defined in §

45.2-1702

and other energy objectives as defined in §

45.2-1706.1

. The term also means any heavy rail transportation facilities operated by a transportation district created under the Transportation District Act of 1964 (§

33.2-1900

et seq.) that operates heavy rail freight service, including rolling stock, barge loading facilities, and any related marine or rail equipment. The term also means, without limitation, the design and construction of roads, the construction of local government buildings, including administrative and operations systems and other local government equipment and infrastructure, public parking garages and other public transportation facilities, and facilities for public transportation by commuter rail. In addition, the term means any project as defined in § 5.1-30.1 or 10.1-603.28 and any professional sports facility, including a major league baseball stadium as defined in §

15.2-5800

, provided that the specific professional sports facility projects have been designated by the General Assembly as eligible for assistance from the Authority. The term also means any equipment, facilities, and technology infrastructure designed to provide broadband service. The term also means facilities supporting, related to, or otherwise used for public safety, including but not limited to law-enforcement training facilities and emergency response, fire, rescue, and police stations. The term also means the remediation, redevelopment, and rehabilitation of property contaminated by the release of hazardous substances, hazardous wastes, solid wastes, or petroleum, where such remediation has not clearly been mandated by the United States Environmental Protection Agency, the Department of Environmental Quality, or a court pursuant to the Comprehensive Environmental Response, Compensation and Liability Act (42 U.S.C. § 9601 et seq.), the Resource Conservation and Recovery Act (42 U.S.C. § 6901 et seq.), the Virginia Waste Management Act (§ 10.1-1400 et seq.), the State Water Control Law (§

62.1-44.2

et seq.), or other applicable statutory or common law or where jurisdiction of those statutes has been waived. The term also means any program or project for land conservation, parks, park facilities, land for recreational purposes, or land preservation, including but not limited to any program or project involving the acquisition of rights or interests in land for the conservation or preservation of such land. The term also means any dredging program or dredging project undertaken to benefit the economic and community development goals of a local government but does not include any dredging program or dredging project undertaken for or by the Virginia Port Authority. The term also means any oyster restoration project, including planting and replanting with seed oysters, oyster shells, or other material that will catch, support, and grow oysters. The term also means any program or project to perform site acquisition or site development work for the benefit of economic and community development projects for any local government. The term also means any undertaking by a local government to build or facilitate the building of a recovered gas energy facility; and any local government renewable energy project, including solar, wind, biomass, waste-to-energy, and geothermal projects. The term also means any undertaking by a local government to facilitate the remediation of residential properties contaminated by the presence of defective drywall.

“Recovered gas energy facility”
means a facility, located at or adjacent to (i) a solid waste management facility permitted by the Department of Environmental Quality or (ii) a sewerage system or sewage treatment work described in §

62.1-44.18

that is constructed and operated for the purpose of treating sewage and wastewater for discharge to state waters, which facility or work is constructed and operated for the purpose of (a) reclaiming or collecting methane or other combustible gas from the biodegradation or decomposition of solid waste, as defined in § 10.1-1400, that has been deposited in the solid waste management facility or sewerage system or sewage treatment work and (b) either using such gas to generate electric energy or upgrading the gas to pipeline quality and transmitting it off premises for sale or delivery to commercial or industrial purchasers or to a public utility or locality.

History.

1984, c. 699; 1985, c. 67; 1986, c. 331; 1987, cc. 117, 133; 1989, cc. 533, 551; 1990, c. 506; 1998, c. 399; 1999, c. 897; 2000, c. 790; 2001, cc. 652, 661; 2005, cc. 727, 769; 2007, cc. 81, 649, 663; 2008, cc. 3, 24, 238, 259, 504, 605, 613; 2009, cc. 14, 246, 311, 543, 632; 2010, cc. 42, 724, 820; 2011, cc. 270, 616; 2018, c. 153; 2021, Sp. Sess. I, c. 327; 2022, cc. 739, 782.

Editor’s note.

References in this section were updated at the direction of the Virginia Code Commission to conform to the recodification of Title 33.2 by Acts 2014, c. 805, effective October 1, 2014.

Effective October 1, 2021,
“§

45.2-1702

” was substituted for “§ 11-34.2” and “§

45.2-1706.1

” was substituted for “§ 67-101.1” to conform with recodification of Title 67 by Acts 2021, Sp. Sess. I, c. 387 at the direction of the Virginia Code Commission.

The 2000 amendments.

The 2000 amendment by c. 790 added the language following “§ 5.1-30.1” at the end of the paragraph defining “Project.”

The 2001 amendments.

The 2001 amendment by cc. 652 and 661 are identical, and added the last two sentences in the paragraph defining “Project.”

The 2005 amendments.

The 2005 amendment by c. 727 inserted the fourth sentence in the definition of “Project.”

The 2005 amendment by c. 769 inserted the definitions for “Federal facility,” “Federal government” and “Former federal facility;” in the paragraph defining “Project” inserted “federal facility or former federal facility, or” near the beginning, inserted clause (ii) and made a stylistic change.

The 2007 amendments.

The 2007 amendments by cc. 81 and 663 are identical, and in the paragraph defining “Cost,” inserted “real estate appraisals” preceding “site preparation and development” in the second sentence and added the last sentence; and added the last sentence in the paragraph defining “Project.”

The 2007 amendment by c. 649 inserted the present fifth sentence in the definition of “Project.”

The 2008 amendments.

The 2008 amendments by cc. 3 and 238 are identical, and inserted “parks, park facilities, land for recreational purposes” in the last sentence of the definition of “Project.”

The 2008 amendments by cc. 24 and 613 are identical, and inserted the present third sentence of the paragraph defining “Project.”

The 2008 amendments by cc. 259 and 605 are identical, and inserted “the construction of local government buildings” in the fourth sentence of the definition of “Project.”

The 2008 amendment by c. 504 deleted “wireless” preceding “broadband services” in the sixth sentence of the definition of “Project.”

The 2009 amendments.

The 2009 amendments by cc. 14 and 632 are identical, and added the last sentence in the definition of “Project.”

The 2009 amendments by cc. 246 and 311 are identical, and also added a last sentence to the definition of “Project.” At the direction of the Virginia Code Commission, the words “for the benefit” were retained from this version and inserted into the version enacted by Acts 2009, cc. 14 and 632.

The 2009 amendment by c. 543 inserted “including administrative and operations systems and other local government equipment and infrastructure” in the fifth sentence in the definition of “Project.”

The 2010 amendments.

The 2010 amendment by c. 42 inserted the next-to-last sentence of the paragraph defining “Project.”

The 2010 amendment by c. 724 inserted the last sentence in the definition of “project”; and added the definition of “recovered gas energy facility.”

The 2010 amendment by c. 820 added the definition for “defective drywall” and added the last sentence in the definition of “project.”

The 2011 amendments.

The 2011 amendment by c. 270 added “and any local government renewable energy project, including solar, wind, biomass, waste-to-energy, and geothermal projects” in the next-to-last sentence in the definition for “Project.”

The 2011 amendment by c. 616, in the definition for “Bonds,” substituted “obligations of the Authority for the payment of money” for “evidences of indebtedness of the Authority”; and in the definition for “Local obligations,” inserted “credit enhancements” and substituted “obligations of a local government for the payment of money” for “evidences of indebtedness of a local government.”

The 2018 amendments.

The 2018 amendment by c. 153, in the definition of “Project,” inserted “The term also means any dredging program or dredging project undertaken to benefit the economic and community development goals of a local government but does not include any dredging program or dredging project undertaken for or by the Virginia Port Authority”; and made stylistic changes.

The 2021 Sp. Sess. I amendments.

The 2021 amendment by Sp. Sess. I, c. 327, effective July 1, 2021, substituted “§ 67-101.1” for “§ 67-101” at the end of the third sentence in the definition of “Project.”

The 2022 amendments.

The 2022 amendments by cc. 739 and 782 are identical, and inserted “or 10.1-603.28” in the fifth sentence in the “Project” definition.

§ 62.1-200.
Creation of Authority.

The Virginia Resources Authority is created, with the duties and powers set forth in this chapter, as a public body corporate and as a political subdivision of the Commonwealth. The exercise by the Authority of the duties and powers conferred by this chapter shall be deemed to be the performance of an essential governmental function of the Commonwealth.

History.

1984, c. 699; 1985, c. 67.

§ 62.1-201.
Board of Directors.

All powers, rights and duties conferred by this chapter or other provisions of law upon the Authority shall be exercised by a board of directors consisting of the State Treasurer or his designee, the State Health Commissioner or his designee, the Director of the Department of Environmental Quality or his designee, the Director of the Department of Aviation or his designee, and seven members appointed by the Governor, subject to confirmation by the General Assembly. The members of the Board of Directors appointed by the Governor shall serve terms of four years each, except that the original terms of three members appointed by the Governor shall end on June 30, 1985, 1986, and 1987, respectively, as designated by the Governor. Any appointment to fill a vacancy on the Board of Directors shall be made for the unexpired term of the member whose death, resignation or removal created the vacancy. All members of the Board of Directors shall be residents of the Commonwealth. Members may be appointed to successive terms on the Board of Directors. Each member of the Board of Directors shall be reimbursed for his or her reasonable expenses incurred in attendance at meetings or when otherwise engaged in the business of the Authority and shall be compensated at the rate provided in §

2.2-2813

for each day or portion thereof in which the member is engaged in the business of the Authority.

The Governor shall designate one member of the Board of Directors as chairman; he shall be the chief executive officer of the Authority. The Board of Directors may elect one member as vice-chairman; he shall exercise the powers of chairman in the absence of the chairman or as directed by the chairman. The State Treasurer or his designee, the Director of the Department of Environmental Quality or his designee, the Director of the Department of Aviation or his designee, and the State Health Commissioner or his designee shall not be eligible to serve as chairman or vice-chairman.

Meetings of the Board of Directors shall be held at the call of the chairman or of any five members. Six members of the Board of Directors shall constitute a quorum for the transaction of the business of the Authority. An act of the majority of the members of the Board of Directors present at any regular or special meeting at which a quorum is present shall be an act of the Board of Directors. No vacancy on the Board of Directors shall impair the right of a majority of a quorum of the members of the Board of Directors to exercise all the rights and perform all the duties of the Authority.

Notwithstanding the provisions of any other law, no officer or employee of the Commonwealth shall be deemed to have forfeited or shall have forfeited his or her office or employment by reason of acceptance of membership on the Board of Directors or by providing service to the Authority.

History.

1984, c. 699; 1989, cc. 533, 551; 1992, c. 887; 2000, cc. 38, 197; 2012, cc. 114, 242.

The 2000 amendments.

The 2000 amendments by cc. 38 and 197 are identical, and in the first sentence of subsection A, substituted “the Director of the Department of Aviation, or his designee, and seven members” for “and six members”; in the last sentence of subsection B, inserted “the Director of the Department of Aviation, or his designee”; and, in subsection C, substituted “five” for “four” in the first sentence, and “Six” for “Five” at the beginning of the second sentence.

The 2012 amendments.

The 2012 amendments by cc. 114 and 242 are identical, and in subsections A and B, inserted “or his designee” following “State Treasurer” and “or his designee” following “State Health Commissioner.”

OPINIONS OF THE ATTORNEY GENERAL

Authority over personnel issues. —

The Board of Directors of the Virginia Resources Authority has the exclusive power over personnel issues, with the exception of the Governor’s ability to appoint the Executive Director pursuant to §

62.1-202

. See opinion of Attorney General to William G. O’Brien, Chairman, Board of Directors, Virginia Resources Authority, 02-077, 2002 Va. AG LEXIS 155 (9/19/02).

§ 62.1-202.
Appointment and duties of Executive Director.

The Governor shall appoint an Executive Director of the Authority, who shall report to, but not be a member of, the Board of Directors. The Executive Director shall serve as the ex officio secretary of the Board of Directors and shall administer, manage and direct the affairs and activities of the Authority in accordance with the policies and under the control and direction of the Board of Directors. He shall attend meetings of the Board of Directors, shall keep a record of the proceedings of the Board of Directors and shall maintain and be custodian of all books, documents and papers of the Authority, the minute book of the Authority and its official seal. He may cause copies to be made of all minutes and other records and documents of the Authority and may give certificates under seal of the Authority to the effect that the copies are true copies, and all persons dealing with the Authority may rely upon the certificates. He shall also perform other duties as instructed by the Board of Directors in carrying out the purposes of this chapter. He shall execute a surety bond in a penalty sum determined by the Board of Directors. The surety bond shall be executed by a surety company authorized to transact business in the Commonwealth and shall be conditioned upon the faithful performance of the duties of the office.

History.

1984, c. 699; 1994, c. 684.

§ 62.1-203.
Powers of Authority.

The Authority is granted all powers necessary or appropriate to carry out and to effectuate its purposes, including the following:

To have perpetual succession as a public body corporate and as a political subdivision of the Commonwealth;

To adopt, amend and repeal bylaws, and rules and regulations, not inconsistent with this chapter for the administration and regulation of its affairs and to carry into effect the powers and purposes of the Authority and the conduct of its business;

To sue and be sued in its own name;

To have an official seal and alter it at will although the failure to affix this seal shall not affect the validity of any instrument executed on behalf of the Authority;

To maintain an office at any place within the Commonwealth which it designates;

To make and execute contracts and all other instruments and agreements necessary or convenient for the performance of its duties and the exercise of its powers and functions under this chapter;

To sell, convey, mortgage, pledge, lease, exchange, transfer and otherwise dispose of all or any part of its properties and assets;

To employ officers, employees, agents, advisers and consultants, including without limitations, attorneys, financial advisers, engineers and other technical advisers and public accountants and, the provisions of any other law to the contrary notwithstanding, to determine their duties and compensation without the approval of any other agency or instrumentality;

To procure insurance, in amounts and from insurers of its choice, or provide self-insurance, against any loss, cost, or expense in connection with its property, assets or activities, including insurance or self-insurance against liability for its acts or the acts of its directors, employees or agents and for the indemnification of the members of its Board of Directors and its employees and agents;

To procure credit enhancements from any public or private entities, including any department, agency or instrumentality of the United States of America or the Commonwealth, for the payment of any bonds issued by the Authority, including the power to pay premiums or fees on any such credit enhancements;

To receive and accept from any source aid, grants and contributions of money, property, labor or other things of value to be held, used and applied to carry out the purposes of this chapter subject to the conditions upon which the aid, grants or contributions are made;

To enter into agreements with any department, agency or instrumentality of the United States of America or, the Commonwealth, the District of Columbia or any adjoining state for the purpose of planning, regulating and providing for the financing of any projects;

To collect, or to authorize the trustee under any trust indenture securing any bonds or any other fiduciary to collect, amounts due under any local obligations owned or credit enhanced by the Authority, including taking the action required by §

15.2-2659

or

62.1-216.1

to obtain payment of any unpaid sums;

To enter into contracts or agreements for the servicing and processing of local obligations owned by the Authority;

To invest or reinvest its funds as provided in this chapter or permitted by applicable law;

Unless restricted under any agreement with holders of bonds, to consent to any modification with respect to the rate of interest, time and payment of any installment of principal or interest, or any other term of any local obligations owned by the Authority;

To establish and revise, amend and repeal, and to charge and collect, fees and charges in connection with any activities or services of the Authority;

To do any act necessary or convenient to the exercise of the powers granted or reasonably implied by this chapter; and

To pledge as security for the payment of any or all bonds of the Authority, all or any part of the Capital Reserve Fund or other reserve fund or account transferred to a trustee for such purpose from the Water Facilities Revolving Fund pursuant to §

62.1-231

, from the Water Supply Revolving Fund pursuant to §

62.1-240

, from the Virginia Solid Waste or Recycling Revolving Fund pursuant to §

62.1-241.9

, from the Virginia Airports Revolving Fund pursuant to § 5.1-30.6, from the Dam Safety, Flood Prevention and Protection Assistance Fund pursuant to § 10.1-603.17, from the Virginia Tobacco Region Revolving Fund pursuant to § 3.2-3117, or from the Resilient Virginia Revolving Fund pursuant to § 10.1-603.37. Notwithstanding the foregoing, any such transfer from the Virginia Tobacco Region Revolving Fund may be pledged to secure only those bonds of the Authority issued to finance or refinance projects located in the tobacco-dependent communities in the Southside and Southwest regions of Virginia.

History.

1984, c. 699; 1985, c. 67; 1986, c. 415; 1987, cc. 117, 133, 324; 1994, c. 684; 1998, c. 399; 1999, c. 897; 2003, c. 561; 2006, cc. 648, 765; 2011, c. 616; 2015, cc. 399, 433; 2022, cc. 739, 782.

Editor’s note.

Acts 2006, cc. 648 and 765, cl. 3 provides: “That the Department of Conservation and Recreation shall repeal through an exempt action the Flood Prevention and Protection Assistance Fund Regulations (4 VAC 5-50-10 et seq.).”

Acts 2006, cc. 648 and 765, cl. 4 provides: “That upon the effective date of this act, the Department of Accounts, with the concurrence of the Department of Conservation and Recreation, may transfer the Dam Safety, Flood Prevention and Protection Assistance Fund and its unobligated balance to the Virginia Resources Authority to be administered and managed in accordance with this act.”

The 2003 amendments.

The 2003 amendment by c. 561 substituted “§

62.1-216.1

” for “§

62.1-217

” in subdivision 13.

The 2006 amendments.

The 2006 amendments by cc. 648 and 765 are identical and, in subdivision 19, inserted “or other reserve fund or account,” added “or from the Dam Safety, Flood Prevention and Protection Assistance Fund pursuant to § 10.1-603.17” and made related changes.

The 2011 amendments.

The 2011 amendment by c. 616 substituted “payment of any unpaid sums” for “payment of any sums in default” in subdivision 13.

The 2015 amendments.

The 2015 amendments by cc. 399 and 433 are identical, and in subdivision 19, added “or from the Virginia Tobacco Region Revolving Fund pursuant to § 3.2-3117” at the end of the first sentence and added the second sentence; and made related changes.

The 2022 amendments.

The 2022 amendments by cc. 739 and 782 are identical, and substituted “§ 10.1-603.17, from the Virginia Tobacco Region Revolving Fund pursuant to § 3.2-3117, or from the Resilient Virginia Revolving Fund pursuant to § 10.1-603.37.” for “§ 10.1-603.17, or from the Virginia Tobacco Region Revolving Fund pursuant to § 3.2-3117.” in subdivision 19.

§ 62.1-204.
Power to borrow money and issue bonds and credit enhancements.

The Authority shall have the power to borrow money and issue its bonds in amounts the Authority determines to be necessary or convenient to provide funds to carry out its purposes and powers and to pay all costs and expenses incurred in connection with the issuance of bonds. The Authority shall also have the power to issue credit enhancements with respect to local obligations issued to finance or refinance the cost of any project. The total outstanding aggregate principal amount of bonds issued by the Authority and local obligations guaranteed by the Authority pursuant to credit enhancements, that in either case are secured by a capital reserve fund pursuant to the provisions of §

62.1-215

, shall not exceed the sum of $1.5 billion without prior approval of the General Assembly.

Notwithstanding the foregoing, the Authority shall not exceed the sum of eight million dollars in the total principal amount of bonds outstanding at any one time for the purpose of financing any heavy rail transportation facilities.

History.

1984, c. 699; 1985, c. 67; 1989, cc. 533, 551; 1990, c. 506; 1994, c. 684; 1998, c. 399; 1999, c. 104; 2001, c. 574; 2009, c. 324.

The 2001 amendments.

The 2001 amendment by c. 574 substituted “$900 million” for “$550 million” in the last sentence of the first paragraph.

The 2009 amendments.

The 2009 amendment by c. 324 substituted “$1.5 billion” for “$900 million” in the first paragraph.

§ 62.1-205.
Power to issue refunding bonds.

The Authority shall have the power: (i) to issue bonds to renew or to pay bonds, including the interest, (ii) whenever it deems refunding expedient, to refund any bonds by the issuance of new bonds, whether the bonds to be refunded have or have not matured, and (iii) to issue bonds partly to refund bonds then outstanding and partly for its corporate purposes. The refunding bonds may be exchanged for the bonds to be refunded or they may be sold and the proceeds applied to the purchase, redemption or payment of the bonds to be refunded. The amount of the bonds issued by the Authority and refunded with proceeds of refunding bonds issued hereunder shall not be included in the total of outstanding bonds for purposes of the limit on the amount of bonds issued by the Authority as provided in §

62.1-204

.

History.

1984, c. 699; 1994, c. 684.

§ 62.1-206.
Sources of payment and security for bonds and credit enhancements.

The Authority shall have the power to pledge any revenue or funds of or under the control of the Authority to the payment of its bonds and credit enhancements, subject only to any prior agreements with the holders of particular bonds or the beneficiaries of particular credit enhancements pledging money or revenue. Bonds or credit enhancements issued by the Authority may be secured by a pledge of any local obligation owned by the Authority, any grant, contribution or guaranty from the United States of America, the Commonwealth or any corporation, association, institution or person, any other property or assets of or under the control of the Authority, or a pledge of any money, income or revenue of the Authority from any source.

History.

1984, c. 699; 1985, c. 67; 1986, c. 415; 1998, c. 399.